Utah statutes.
75-3-602.   Acceptance of appointment -- Consent to jurisdiction.

By accepting appointment, a personal representative submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding relating to the estate that may be instituted by any interested person. Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the personal representative, or mailed to him by ordinary first-class mail at his address as listed in the application or petition for appointment or as thereafter reported to the court and to his address as then known to the petitioner.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

